District of Columbia statutes.
29A-101.74

Repealed

Sale, lease, exchange, or mortgage of assets in usual and regular course of business.

Repealed.

June 8, 1954, 68 Stat. 211, ch. 269, § 74
Sept. 2, 1957, 71 Stat. 570, Pub. L. 85-254, § 17
July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 3(j), 58 DCR 1720
2001 Ed., § 29-101.74.
1981 Ed., § 29-374.
1973 Ed., § 29-928.